Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2394 N 1
SFX 2394 0 yards .

SFX 2395 N 1
SFX 2395 0 yDoubleQuote .

SFX 2396 N 1
SFX 2396 0 ye .

SFX 2397 N 1
SFX 2397 0 Yellow .

SFX 2398 N 1
SFX 2398 0 yes .

SFX 2399 N 1
SFX 2399 0 YPrimeZeros .

SFX 2400 N 1
SFX 2400 0 yQ .

SFX 2401 N 1
SFX 2401 0 yQuote .

SFX 2402 N 1
SFX 2402 0 YZero .

SFX 2403 N 1
SFX 2403 0 YZeros .

SFX 2404 N 1
SFX 2404 0 zer .

SFX 2405 N 1
SFX 2405 0 Zero .

SFX 2406 N 1
SFX 2406 0 Zeros .

SFX 2407 N 1
SFX 2407 0 Zeta .

SFX 2408 N 1
SFX 2408 0 zhugh .

SFX 2409 N 1
SFX 2409 0 Zone .

SFX 2410 N 1
SFX 2410 0 ZTransform .
